California statutes. Water Code
(a) The department or the board may adopt emergency regulations providing for the electronic filing of reports of water extraction or water diversion or use required to be filed with the department or board under this code, including, but not limited to, any report required to be filed under Part 5.1 (commencing with Section 5100) or Part 5.2 (commencing with Section 5200) of Division 2 and any report required to be filed by a water right permittee or licensee.

(b) Emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section, or any amendments thereto, shall be adopted by the department or the board in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The adoption
 of these regulations is an emergency and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, and general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, any emergency regulations or amendments to those regulations adopted under this section shall remain in effect until revised by the department or the board that adopted the regulations or amendments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 5.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Water Shortage Emergencies [350. - 359.]

350.

The governing body of a distributor of a public water supply, whether publicly or privately owned and including a mutual water company, shall declare a water shortage emergency condition to prevail within the area served by such distributor whenever it finds and determines that the ordinary demands and requirements of water consumers cannot be satisfied without depleting the water supply of the distributor to the extent that there would be insufficient water for human consumption, sanitation, and fire protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 1.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

351.

(a) Except in the event of a wildfire, a deenergization event, or a breakage or failure of a dam, pump, pipeline, or conduit causing an immediate emergency, the governing body of a public water supplier shall make a declaration pursuant to Section 350 only after a public hearing at which consumers of the water supply shall have an opportunity to be heard to protest the declaration and to present their respective needs to the governing board.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “deenergization event” means a planned power outage, undertaken by an electrical corporation, as defined in Section 218 of the Public Utilities Code, to reduce the risk of wildfires caused
 by utility equipment, pursuant to Public Utilities Commission Resolution ESRB-8 and any decisions issued by the commission, the former Wildfire Safety Division, as set forth in former Section 326 of the Public Utilities Code, the Office of Energy Infrastructure Safety, or any other agency with authority over electrical corporations. A deenergization event commences when an electrical corporation provides notice to any state agency or political subdivision of the potential need to initiate a planned deenergization of the electrical grid, and ceases when the electrical corporation restores electrical services to all deenergized customers, or at such time as the electrical corporation cancels the deenergization event for some or all of its affected customers, and rescinds the notice of the potential
 need to initiate the deenergization event. A deenergization event does not include any planned outages in connection with regular utility work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 67.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

352.

Notice of the time and place of hearing shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code at least seven days prior to the date of hearing in a newspaper printed, published, and circulated within the area in which the water supply is distributed, or if there is no such newspaper, in any newspaper printed, published, and circulated in the county in which the area is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

353.

When the governing body has so determined and declared the existence of an emergency condition of water shortage within its service area, it shall thereupon adopt such regulations and restrictions on the delivery of water and the consumption within said area of water supplied for public use as will in the sound discretion of such governing body conserve the water supply for the greatest public benefit with particular regard to domestic use, sanitation, and fire protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

354.

After allocating and setting aside the amount of water which in the opinion of the governing body will be necessary to supply water needed for domestic use, sanitation, and fire protection, the regulations may establish priorities in the use of water for other purposes and provide for the allocation, distribution, and delivery of water for such other purposes, without discrimination between consumers using water for the same purpose or purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

355.

The regulations and restrictions shall thereafter be and remain in full force and effect during the period of the emergency and until the supply of water available for distribution within such area has been replenished or augmented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

356.

The regulations and restrictions may include the right to deny applications for new or additional service connections, and provision for their enforcement by discontinuing service to consumers wilfully violating the regulations and restrictions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

357.

If the regulations and restrictions on delivery and consumption of water adopted pursuant to this chapter conflict with any law establishing the rights of individual consumers to receive either specific or proportionate amounts of the water supply available for distribution within such service area, the regulations and restrictions adopted pursuant to this chapter shall prevail over the provisions of such laws relating to water rights for the duration of the period of emergency; provided, however, that any distributor of water which is subject to regulation by the State Public Utilities Commission shall before making such regulations and restrictions effective secure the approval thereof by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

358.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or prevent review by any court of competent jurisdiction of any finding or determination by a governing board of the existence of an emergency or of regulations or restrictions adopted by such board, pursuant to this chapter, on the ground that any such action is fraudulent, arbitrary, or capricious.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

359.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law that requires an election for the purpose of authorizing a contract with the United States, or for incurring the obligation to repay loans from the United States, and except as otherwise limited or prohibited by the California Constitution, a public water agency, as an alternative procedure to submitting the proposal to an election, upon affirmative vote of four-fifths of the members of the governing body thereof, may apply for, accept, provide for the repayment together with interest thereon, and use funds made available by the federal government pursuant to Public Law 95-18, pursuant to any other federal act subsequently enacted during 1977 that specifically provides emergency drought relief financing, or pursuant to existing federal relief programs receiving budget augmentations in 1977 for drought assistance, and may enter into contracts that are required to obtain those federal funds pursuant to the provisions of those federal acts if the following conditions exist:

(1) The project is undertaken by a state, regional, or local governmental agency.

(2) As a result of the severe drought now existing in many parts of the state, the agency has insufficient water supply needed to meet necessary agricultural, domestic, industrial, recreational, and fish and wildlife needs within the service area or area of jurisdiction of the agency.

(3) The project will develop or conserve water before October 31, 1978, and will assist in mitigating the impacts of the drought.

(4) The agency affirms that it will comply, if applicable, with Sections 1602, 1603, and 1605 of the Fish and Game Code.

(5) The project will be completed on or before the completion date, if any, required under the federal act providing the funding, but not later than March 1, 1978.

(b) Any obligation to repay loans shall be expressly limited to revenues of the system improved by the proceeds of the contract.

(c) No application for federal funds pursuant to this section shall be made on or after March 1, 1978.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a public agency shall not be exempt from any provision of law that requires the submission of a proposal to an election if a petition requesting such an election signed by 10 percent of the registered voters within the public agency is presented to the governing board within 30 days following the submission of an application for federal funds.

(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a public water agency that applied for federal funds for a project before January 1, 1978, may make application to the Director of the Drought Emergency Task Force for extension of the required completion date specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b). Following receipt of an application for extension, the Director of the Drought Emergency Task Force may extend the required completion date specified in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) to a date not later than September 30, 1978, if the director finds that the project has been delayed by factors not controllable by the public water agency. If the Drought Emergency Task Force is dissolved, the Director of Water Resources shall exercise the authority vested in the Director of the Drought Emergency Task Force pursuant to this section.

(f) For the purposes of this section, “public water agency” means a city, district, agency, authority, or any other political subdivision of the state, except the state, that distributes water to the inhabitants thereof, is otherwise authorized by law to enter into contracts or agreements with the federal government for a water supply or for financing facilities for a water supply, and is otherwise required by law to submit those agreements or contracts or any other project involving long-term debt to an election within that public water agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 668.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.3. Excessive Residential Water Use During Drought [365. - 367.]

365.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter furthers important state policies of encouraging water conservation and protecting water resources in the interest of the people and for the public welfare.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, “urban retail water supplier” has the same meaning as provided in Section 10608.12.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 230, Sec. 1.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

366.

(a) During periods described in subdivision (a) of Section 367, excessive water use is prohibited by a residential customer in a single-family residence or by a customer in a multiunit housing complex in which each unit is individually metered or submetered by the urban retail water supplier.

(b) Each urban retail water supplier shall establish a method to identify and discourage excessive water use, through one of the following options:

(1) Establishing a rate structure, subject to applicable constitutional and statutory limitations, that includes block tiers, water budgets, or rate surcharges over and above base rates for excessive water use by a residential water customer.

(2) (A) Establishing an excessive water use ordinance, rule, or tariff condition, or amending an existing ordinance, rule, or tariff condition, that includes a definition of or a procedure to identify and address excessive water use by metered single-family residential customers and customers in multiunit housing complexes in which each unit is individually metered or submetered and may include a process to issue written warnings to a customer and perform a site audit of customer water usage prior to deeming the customer in violation.

(B) For the purposes of subparagraph (A), excessive water use shall be measured in terms of either gallons or hundreds of cubic feet of water used during the urban retail water supplier’s regular billing cycle. In establishing the definition of excessive use, the urban retail water supplier may consider factors that include, but
 are not limited to, all of the following:

(i) Average daily use.

(ii) Full-time occupancy of households.

(iii) Amount of landscaped land on a property.

(iv) Rate of evapotranspiration.

(v) Seasonal weather changes.

(C) (i) A violation of an excessive use ordinance, rule, or tariff condition established pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall result in an infraction or administrative civil penalty. The penalty for a violation may be based on conditions identified by the urban retail water supplier and may include, but is not limited to, a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500) for each hundred cubic feet of
 water, or 748 gallons, used above the excessive water use threshold established by the urban retail water supplier in a billing cycle.

(ii) Any fine imposed pursuant to this subparagraph shall be added to the customer’s water bill and is due and payable with that water bill.

(iii) Each urban retail water supplier shall have a process for nonpayment of the fine, which shall be consistent with due process and reasonably similar to the water supplier’s existing process for nonpayment of a water bill.

(D) (i) Consistent with due process, an urban retail water supplier shall establish a process and conditions for the appeal of a fine imposed pursuant to subparagraph (C) whereby the customer may contest the imposition of the fine for excessive water use.

(ii) As part of the appeal process, the customer shall be provided with an opportunity to provide evidence that there was no excessive water use or of a bona fide reason for the excessive water use, including evidence of a water leak, a medical reason, or any other reasonable justification for the water use, as determined by the urban retail water supplier.

(iii) As part of the appeal process, the urban retail water supplier shall provide documentation demonstrating the excessive water use.

(c) (1) The provisions of subdivision (b) do not apply to an urban retail water supplier that is not fully metered in accordance with Section 527. An urban retail water supplier shall comply with the provisions of subdivision (b) when all of the water supplier’s residential water service connections are being
 billed based on metered water usage.

(2) An urban retail water supplier that is not fully metered shall prohibit water use practices by an ordinance, resolution, rule, or tariff condition that imposes penalties for prohibited uses of water supplied by the water supplier. The urban retail water supplier may include a process to issue written warnings prior to imposing penalties as well as increased penalty amounts for successive violations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 260.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

367.

(a) This chapter applies only as follows:

(1) During a period for which the Governor has issued a proclamation of a state of emergency under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) based on statewide drought conditions to an urban retail water supplier that has moved to a stage of action in response to a local water supply shortage condition under the water supplier’s contingency plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10632 that requires mandatory water use reductions.

(2) To an urban retail water supplier during a period in which the water supplier has moved to a stage of
 action in response to a local water supply shortage condition under the water supplier’s contingency plan pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10632 that requires mandatory water use reductions.

(3) To an urban retail water supplier affected during a period for which the Governor has issued a proclamation of a state of emergency under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code) based on local drought conditions.

(b) The provisions of this chapter are in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any other measures or remedies implemented by an urban retail water supplier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 230, Sec. 1.   (SB 814)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.4. Allocation-Based Conservation Water Pricing [370. - 374.]

370.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The use of allocation-based conservation water pricing by public entities that sell and distribute water is one effective means by which waste or unreasonable use of water can be prevented and water can be saved in the interest of the people and for the public welfare, within the contemplation of Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(b) It is in the best interest of the people of California to encourage public entities to voluntarily use allocation-based conservation water pricing, tailored to local needs and conditions, as a means of increasing efficient uses of water, and further discouraging wasteful or unreasonable use of water under both normal and dry-year hydrologic conditions.

(c) The Legislature intends that allocation-based conservation water pricing is an alternative method that can be used by public entities to encourage water users to conserve water, increase efficient uses of water, and further discourage waste of water. The Legislature does not intend to limit the discretion of public entities to evaluate and select among different methods for conserving water or to create a presumption that the election to not use a particular method is a waste or unreasonable use of water by the public entity.

(d) Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit, or dictate, the design of rate structures that public entities may use to promote conservation by water users.

(e) Nothing in this chapter directs, or otherwise compels, a public entity to use allocation-based conservation water pricing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

371.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Allocation-based conservation water pricing” means a retail water rate structure that meets all of the criteria in Section 372.

(b) “Basic charge” means a volumetric unit charge for the cost of water service other than any fixed costs that are recovered through meter charges or other fixed charges other than incremental costs that are recovered through conservation charges. A basic charge may include the cost of generally applicable conservation measures assumed in establishing basic use allocations.

(c) “Conservation charge” means a volumetric unit charge for incremental costs.

(d) “Incremental costs” means the costs of water service, including capital costs, that the public entity incurs directly, or by contract, as a result of the use of water in excess of the basic use allocation or to implement water conservation or demand management measures employed to increase efficient uses of water, and further discourage the wasteful or unreasonable use of water, and may include any of the following:

(1) Conservation best management practices, conservation education, irrigation controls and other conservation devices, and other demand management measures.

(2) Water system retrofitting, dual plumbing and facilities for production, distribution, and all uses of recycled water and other alternative water supplies.

(3) Projects and programs for prevention, control, or treatment of the runoff of water from irrigation and other outdoor water uses. Incremental costs shall not include the costs of stormwater management systems and programs.

(4) Securing dry-year water supply arrangements.

(5) Procuring water supplies to satisfy increments of water use in excess of the basic use allocations for the customers of the public entity, including supply or capacity contracts for water supply rights or entitlements and related energy costs for water delivery.

(e) “Public entity” means a city, whether general law or chartered, county, city and county, special district, agency, authority, any other municipal public corporation or district, or any other political subdivision of the state that provides retail water service and that is an urban water supplier, as defined in Section 10617.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

372.

(a) A public entity may employ allocation-based conservation water pricing that meets all of the following criteria:

(1) Billing is based on metered water use.

(2) A basic use allocation is established for each customer account that provides a reasonable amount of water for the customer’s needs and property characteristics. Factors used to determine the basic use allocation may include, but are not limited to, the number of occupants, the type or classification of use, the size of lot or irrigated area, and the local climate data for the billing period. Nothing in this chapter prohibits a customer of the public entity from challenging whether the basic use allocation established for that customer’s account is reasonable under the circumstances. Nothing in this chapter is intended to permit public entities to limit the use of property through the establishment of a basic use allocation.

(3) A basic charge is imposed for all water used within the customer’s basic use allocation, except that at the option of the public entity, a lower rate may be applied to any portion of the basic use allocation that the public entity has determined to represent superior or more than reasonable conservation efforts.

(4) A conservation charge shall be imposed on all increments of water use in excess of the basic use allocation. The increments may be fixed or may be determined on a percentage or any other basis, without limitation on the number of increments, or any requirement that the increments or conservation charges be sized, or ascend uniformly, or in a specified relationship. The volumetric prices for the lowest through the highest priced increments shall be established in an ascending relationship that is economically structured to encourage conservation and reduce the inefficient use of water, consistent with Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(b) (1) Except as specified in subdivision (a), the design of an allocation-based conservation pricing rate structure shall be determined in the discretion of the public entity.

(2) The public entity may impose meter charges or other fixed charges to recover fixed costs of water service in addition to the allocation-based conservation pricing rate structure.

(c) A public entity may use one or more allocation-based conservation water pricing structures for any class of municipal or other service that the public entity provides.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

373.

(a) Revenues derived from allocation-based conservation water pricing shall not exceed the reasonable cost of water service including basic costs and incremental costs. This chapter does not limit the sources of funding for incremental costs to charges for water use.

(b) Revenues derived from allocation-based conservation water pricing shall not exceed the proportional cost of service attributable to the customer’s parcel, as determined by giving consideration to all of the following:

(1) Customer classes established in consideration of service characteristics, demand patterns, and other factors.

(2) Basic use allocations.

(3) Meter size.

(4) Metered volume of water consumed.

(5) The public entity’s discretionary allocation of incremental costs between and among the increments of water use subject to conservation charges, as permitted by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 372 to meet the requirement of that section.

(c) In establishing the schedule of charges and metered volumes for the increments of water use subject to conservation charges, the public entity may also consider both of the following:

(1) Customer overuse characteristics, including ratios between overuse volumes and basic use allocations, variations in demand and consumption patterns, or other characteristics of overuse experienced by the public entity.

(2) The extent to which the pricing structure of the increments will be effective in minimizing or eliminating the need for other measures to curtail potential overuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

374.

(a) Allocation-based conservation water pricing under this chapter may be used on an ongoing basis and shall not require any finding of emergency or other water shortage conditions.

(b) The authority granted in this chapter is in addition to any other authority that a public entity has to use rate structure design to foster the conservation of water.

(c) The imposition and revision of rates and charges by a public entity under this chapter shall be subject to the procedures otherwise required by law for the public entity’s water rates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 610, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Water Conservation Programs [375. - 378.]

375.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, any public entity that supplies water at retail or wholesale for the benefit of persons within the service area or area of jurisdiction of the public entity may, by ordinance or resolution adopted by a majority of the members of the governing body after holding a public hearing upon notice and making appropriate findings of necessity for the adoption of a water conservation program, adopt and enforce a water conservation program to reduce the quantity of water used by those persons for the purpose of conserving the water supplies of the public entity.

(b) With regard to water delivered for other than agricultural uses, the ordinance or resolution may
 specifically require the installation of water-saving devices that are designed to reduce water consumption. The ordinance or resolution may also encourage water conservation through rate structure design.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, “public entity” means a city, whether general law or chartered, county, city and county, special district, agency, authority, any other municipal public corporation or district, or any other political subdivision of the state.

(d) For the purposes of this section and subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 377, “person” means any person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business, trust, corporation, company, or public agency, including any city, county, city and county, district, joint powers authority, or any agency or department of a public agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 27, Sec. 9.   (SB 88)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

375.5.

(a) A public entity may undertake water conservation and public education programs in conjunction with school districts, public libraries, or any other public entity.

(b) (1) A public entity may undertake water conservation and public education programs using an information booklet or materials for use in connection with the use or transfer of real estate containing up to four residential units. For the purposes of this subdivision, the public entity may use water conservation materials prepared by the department.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that on or before December 31, 2007, a review
 of the program be conducted to obtain information on both of the following matters:

(A) The extent to which public entities have undertaken water conservation and public education programs referred to in paragraph (1).

(B) The extent to which water conservation may be attributable to the implementation of water conservation and public education programs referred to in paragraph (1).

(c) A public entity may take into account any programs undertaken pursuant to this section in a rate structure design implemented pursuant to Section 375.

(d) The Legislature finds and declares that a program undertaken pursuant to this section is in the public interest, serves a public purpose, and will promote the health, welfare, and safety of the people of the
 state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 27, Sec. 10.   (SB 88)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

376.

(a) Any ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to Section 375 is effective upon adoption. Within 10 days after its adoption, the ordinance or resolution shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in full in a newspaper of general circulation that is printed, published, and circulated in the public entity. If there is no such newspaper, the ordinance or resolution shall be posted within 10 days after its adoption in three public places within the public entity.

(b) The publication of ordinances or resolutions, as required by subdivision (a), may be satisfied by either of the following actions:

(1) The public entity may publish a summary of a proposed ordinance, resolution, or proposed amendment to an existing ordinance or resolution. The summary shall be prepared by an official designated by the governing body. A summary shall be published and a certified copy of the full text of the proposed ordinance, resolution, or amendment shall be posted in the office of the governing body at least five days prior to the governing body’s meeting at which the proposed ordinance, resolution, or amendment is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance, resolution, or amendment, the governing body shall publish a summary of the ordinance, resolution, or amendment with the names of those members voting for and against the ordinance,
 resolution, or amendment and the official shall post in the office of the governing body a certified copy of the full text of the adopted ordinance, resolution, or amendment along with the names of those members voting for and against the ordinance, resolution, or amendment.

(2) If the official designated by the governing body determines that it is not feasible to prepare a fair and adequate summary of the proposed or adopted ordinance, resolution, or amendment, and if the governing body so orders, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page in a newspaper of general circulation in the county shall be published at least five days prior to the governing body meeting at which the proposed ordinance, resolution, or amendment is to be adopted. Within 15 days after adoption of the ordinance, resolution, or amendment, a display advertisement of at least one-quarter of a page shall be published. The advertisement shall indicate the
 general nature of, and provide information about, the proposed or adopted ordinance, resolution, or amendment, including information sufficient to enable the public to obtain copies of the complete text of the ordinance, resolution, or amendment, and the names of those members voting for and against the ordinance, resolution, or amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 332, Sec. 89.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

377.

(a) From and after the publication or posting of any ordinance or resolution pursuant to Section 376, a violation of a requirement of a water conservation program adopted pursuant to Section 376 is a misdemeanor. A person convicted under this subdivision shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both.

(b) A court or public entity may hold a person civilly liable in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a violation of any of the following:

(1) An ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to Section 376.

(2) A regulation adopted by the board under Section 1058.5 or Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 10609) of Part 2.55 of Division 6, unless the board regulation provides that it cannot be enforced under this section or provides for a lesser applicable maximum penalty.

(c) Commencing on the 31st day after the public entity notified a person of a violation described in subdivision (b), the person additionally may be civilly liable in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) plus five hundred dollars ($500) for each additional day on which the violation continues.

(d) Remedies prescribed in this section are cumulative and not alternative, except that no liability shall be recoverable under this section
 for any violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) if the board has filed a complaint pursuant to Section 1846 alleging the same violation.

(e) A public entity may administratively impose the civil liability described in subdivisions (b) and (c) after providing notice and an opportunity for a hearing. The public entity shall initiate a proceeding under this subdivision by a complaint issued pursuant to Section 377.5. The public entity shall issue the complaint at least 30 days before the hearing on the complaint and the complaint shall state the basis for the proposed civil liability order.

(f) (1) In determining the amount of civil liability to assess, a court or public entity shall take into consideration all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the
 nature and persistence of the violation, the extent of the harm caused by the violation, the length of time over which the violation occurs, and any corrective action taken by the violator.

(2) The civil liability calculated pursuant to paragraph (1) for the first violation of subdivision (b) by a residential water user shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) except in extraordinary situations where the court or public entity finds all of the following:

(A) The residential user had actual notice of the requirement found to be violated.

(B) The conduct was intentional.

(C) The amount of water involved was substantial.

(g) Civil liability imposed pursuant to this section shall be paid to the public entity and expended solely for the purposes of this chapter.

(h) An order setting administrative civil liability shall become effective and final upon issuance of the order and payment shall be made. Judicial review of any final order shall be pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(i) In addition to the remedies prescribed in this section, a public entity may enforce water use limitations established by an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this chapter, or as otherwise authorized by law, by a volumetric penalty in an amount established by the public entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 2.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

377.5.

(a) A complaint or citation under subdivision (b) of Section 377 or subdivision (d) of Section 1058.5 may be issued by any of the following:

(1) A code enforcement officer, as defined in Section 829.5 of the Penal Code.

(2) A designee of the chief executive officer of a public entity authorized to adopt an ordinance or resolution under Section 375.

(3) A designee of the chief executive officer of a city, county, or city and county.

(b) For purposes of this section, the term “chief executive officer” includes a
 city manager, general manager, or other employee of the public entity who is the highest ranking officer or employee, other than a member of a multimember governing body, with responsibility for the operations of the public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 27, Sec. 12.   (SB 88)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

378.

A public entity may enter into agreements with other public entities, businesses, community associations, or private entities to provide water conservation services and measures and materials for implementing water conservation programs adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 31, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.6. Deference to Decisions by Local or Regional Agencies [380. - 387.]

380.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) The various regions of the state differ widely in the availability of water supplies and in the need for water to meet beneficial uses.

(b) Decisions regarding operations to meet water needs can depend in part upon regional differences.

(c) Many water management decisions can best be made at a local or regional level, to the end that local and regional operational flexibility will maximize efficient statewide use of water supplies.

(d) The authority granted by this chapter to local and regional public agencies, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 65930 of the Government Code and not including federal agencies, is in furtherance of the policy declared in Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution and in Section 109.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

381.

The authority of local or regional public agencies pursuant to this chapter shall control over any other provision of law which contains more stringent limitations on the authority of a particular public agency to serve water for use outside the agency, to the extent those other laws are inconsistent with the authority granted herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 867, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

382.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every local or regional public agency authorized by law to serve water to the persons or entities within the service area of the agency may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise transfer, for use outside the agency, either or both of the following:

(1) Water that is surplus to the needs of the water users of the agency.

(2) Water, the use of which is voluntarily foregone, during the period of the transfer, by a water user of the agency.
